Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-426
Capital construction projects; nonprofit
corporation; approval by Legislature.

All capital construction projects,
including applicable financing plans, proposed by any nonprofit corporation
created by the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska or the Board
of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall be submitted to the Legislature
for review and approval or disapproval by the Legislature, or if the Legislature
is not in session, the Executive Board of the Legislative Council, when (1)
state general funds, (2) funds received by the University of Nebraska or any
state college for the purposes of reimbursing overhead costs and expenses
in connection with any federal or other grant or contract, (3) tuition, or
(4) the state's operating investment pool investment income constitutes all
or any part of the funds used for the repayment of all or any part of the
bonds of such nonprofit corporation.

Laws 2014, LB546, § 3.